Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB312.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2807(e) of Title 66 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 2807. Duties of electric distribution companies.* * *(e) Obligation to serve.--A default service provider's obligation to provide electric generation supply service following the expiration of a generation rate cap specified under section 2804(4) (relating to standards for restructuring of electric industry) or a restructuring plan under section 2806(f) is revised as follows:* * *(8) If a customer served by an electric generation 123456789101112131415161718 supplier fails to take affirmative steps to enter into a new contract by the date of termination of the customer's existing fixed duration contract with an electric generation supplier, the customer shall be automatically returned to the default service provider and charged a rate at the default service provider's then-applicable default service rate. Within 60 days of the effective date of this paragraph, the commission shall issue an order requiring each electric distribution company to submit a compliance filing implementing the requirement under this paragraph.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0312PN0246 - 2 - 123456789101112